Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
§ 218d.
Alternative regulation of electric and natural gas companies.

Notwithstanding section 218 and sections 225-227 of this title, upon petition of an electric or natural gas company, upon request of the Department of Public Service, or on its own initiative, the Public Utility Commission may, after opportunity for hearing, approve alternative forms of regulation for an electric or natural gas company; provided, however, in the case of a municipal plant or department formed under local charter or chapter 79 of this title or an electric cooperative formed under chapter 81 of this title, any alternative forms of regulation approved by the Commission shall also be approved by a majority of the voters of a municipality or cooperative voting upon the question at a duly warned annual or special meeting held for that purpose. Before doing so, the Commission shall find that the proposed form of alternative regulation will:

establish a system of regulation in which such companies have clear incentives to provide least cost energy service to their customers;

provide just and reasonable rates for service to all classes of customers;

deliver safe and reliable service;

offer incentives for innovations and improved performance that advance state energy policy such as increasing reliance on Vermont-based renewable energy and decreasing the extent to which the financial success of distribution utilities between rate cases is linked to increased sales to end use customers and may be threatened by decreases in those sales;

promote improved quality of service, reliability, and service choices;

encourage innovation in the provision of service;

establish a reasonably balanced system of risks and rewards that encourages the company to operate as efficiently as possible using sound management practices; and

provide a reasonable opportunity, under sound and economical management, to earn a fair rate of return, provided such opportunity must be consistent with flexible design of alternative regulation and with the inclusion of effective financial incentives in such alternatives.

If savings result from alternative regulation, the savings shall be shared with ratepayers as determined by the Commission.

In the case of a municipal plant or department formed under local charter or chapter 79 of this title or an electric cooperative formed under chapter 81 of this title, alternative regulation may include authority for local elected officials to set and revise rates.

Alternative regulation may include such changes or additions to, waivers of, or alternatives to, traditional rate-making procedures, standards, and mechanisms, including substantive changes to rate base-rate of return rate setting, as the Commission finds will promote the public good and will support the required findings in subsection (a) of this section. In addition, the Commission shall not allow a company to set aside funds collected from ratepayers for the purpose of supporting a future expansion or upgrade of its transmission or distribution network except after notice and opportunity for hearing and only if all of the following apply:

There is a cost estimate for the expansion or upgrade that the company demonstrates is consistent with the principles of least-cost integrated planning as defined in section 218c of this title.

The amount of such funds does not exceed 20 percent of the estimated cost of the expansion or upgrade.

Interest earned on the funds is credited to the ratepayers.

The funds are not disbursed to the company until after expansion or upgrade is in service.

The funds are not used to defray any portion of the costs of expansion or upgrade in excess of the cost estimate described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

The Public Utility Commission may establish, by rule or order, requirements governing the filing of a petition to approve an alternative regulation plan.

The Commission shall act on the petition within 12 months of the filing of a petition that complies with the Commission’s rules.

An alternative regulation plan shall take effect not sooner than 30 days following its approval by the Commission.

The Commission may establish, by rule or order, and may amend from time to time standards and procedures by which the effectiveness of the alternative form of regulation can be determined.

The Commission, on its own motion or the motion of the Department of Public Service or a company operating under an alternative regulation plan pursuant to this section, may investigate any alternative regulation plan that is in effect. Following notice and an opportunity for hearing, the Commission may terminate or modify the alternative regulation plan upon a finding of good cause. Where the Commission revokes prior approval, the Commission shall determine whether the company’s current rates are just and reasonable, and, if not, shall establish new rates that are just and reasonable.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a company may file for rates determined under and in accordance with sections 218, 225, 226, and 227 of this title to be effective at the time of the termination of any approved alternative regulation plan.

In the case of a municipal utility, the Commission shall approve an alternative regulation plan only if the Commission finds that the plan will:

Permit the municipal plant or department to fulfill all of its obligations, including its obligations to the holders of bonds issued under local charter or State law.

Not violate existing covenants in outstanding municipal bonds or in contracts securing bonds issued by the Vermont Public Power Supply Authority.

Not impair the municipality’s access to capital, including that in the municipal bond market. The Commission will consider the opinion of the utility’s bond counsel in making this decision.

Not impair the municipal utility’s ability to participate in future bond issues by the Authority as contemplated by chapter 84 of this title. The Commission will consider the opinion of the Vermont Public Power Supply Authority in making this decision.

In the case of an electric cooperative, the Commission shall approve an alternative regulation plan only if the Commission finds the plan will not violate covenants in existing mortgages or impair the cooperative’s access to capital.

In the case of an investor-owned company, the Commission shall approve an alternative regulation plan, only if the Commission finds the plan will:

not have an adverse impact on the electric company’s eligibility for rate-regulated accounting in accordance with generally accepted accounting standards if applicable; and

reasonably preserve the availability of equity and debt capital resources to the company on favorable terms and conditions.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and sections 218, 225, 226, 227, and 229 of this title, a municipal company formed under local charter or under chapter 79 of this title and an electric cooperative formed under chapter 81 of this title shall be authorized to change its rates for service to its customers if the rate change is:
(n) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and sections 218, 225, 226, 227, and 229 of this title, a municipal company formed under local charter or under chapter 79 of this title and an electric cooperative formed under chapter 81 of this title shall be authorized to change its rates for service to its customers if the rate change is:

applied to all customers equally;

not more than two percent during any twelve-month period;

cumulatively not more than 10 percent from the rates last approved by the Commission; and

not going to take effect more than 10 years from the last approval for a rate change from the Commission.

The municipal company or electric cooperative shall provide written notice of a rate change pursuant to this subsection to its customers, the Department of Public Service, and the Commission at least 45 days prior to implementing the rate change. Included with the submission shall be a rate analysis describing the rationale for the rate change. Unless an objection to the rate change is filed by the Department of Public Service with the Commission within 45 days of this notice or the Commission orders an investigation on its own motion, the municipal company or electric cooperative may implement the rate change.

If the Department does not object to the change within 30 days, five persons adversely affected by the change may apply at their own expense to the Commission by petition alleging why the change is unreasonable and unjust and asking that the Commission investigate the matter and make such orders as justice and law require.

A municipal company or electric cooperative shall be eligible to change its rates pursuant to this subsection only if it has received approval for a rate change from its governing body at a duly warned meeting held for such purpose prior to filing its written notice with the Department and the Commission.

The Commission shall establish, by rule or order, standards and procedures for implementing this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (n) of this section and sections 218, 225, 226, 227, and 229 of this title, a municipal company formed under local charter or under chapter 79 of this title and an electric cooperative formed under chapter 81 of this title shall be authorized to offer innovative rates or services to their customers as pilot programs without obtaining prior approval from the Commission if the rate or service:
(o) (1) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (n) of this section and sections 218, 225, 226, 227, and 229 of this title, a municipal company formed under local charter or under chapter 79 of this title and an electric cooperative formed under chapter 81 of this title shall be authorized to offer innovative rates or services to their customers as pilot programs without obtaining prior approval from the Commission if the rate or service:

is designed to satisfy the requirements of subdivision 8005(a)(3) of this title or to advance the goals of the State Comprehensive Energy Plan;

has a duration of 18 months or less; and

shall not result in:

additions of more than two percent of the municipal company’s or electric cooperative’s net asset; or

an increase in the municipal company’s or electric cooperative’s overall cost-of-service by more than two percent.

The municipal company or electric cooperative shall provide written notice of an innovative rate or service to its customers, the Department of Public Service, and the Commission at least 45 days prior to offering the innovative rate or service to its customers. Included with the submission shall be the terms and conditions of service. Unless an objection to the innovative rate or service is filed with the Commission within 45 days of this notice or the Commission orders an investigation on its own motion, the municipal company or electric cooperative may commence offering the innovative rate or service to its customers.

The municipal company or electric cooperative shall provide written notice to the Department of Public Service and the Commission at least 45 days prior to the end of an innovative rate or service duration period with any proposed modifications to the terms and conditions. Unless an objection to the innovative rate or service is filed with the Commission within 45 days of this notice or the Commission orders an investigation on its own motion, the municipal company or electric cooperative may continue offering the innovative rate or service to its customers. The Commission may allow for the innovative rate or service to remain in effect pending the outcome of an investigation into the notice filing.

The Commission may establish, by rule or order, standards and procedures for implementing and interpreting this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 69

, § 2, eff. June 17, 2003; amended

2005, No. 61

, § 11;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 15a;

2021, No. 13

, § 1.

§ 218e.
Implementing State energy policy; manufacturing.

To give effect to the policies of section 202a of this title to provide reliable and affordable energy and assure the State’s economic vitality, it is critical to retain and recruit manufacturing and other businesses and to consider the impact on manufacturing and other businesses when issuing orders, adopting rules, and making other decisions affecting the cost and reliability of electricity and other fuels. Implementation of the State’s energy policy should:

encourage recruitment and retention of employers providing high-quality jobs and related economic investment and support the State’s economic welfare; and

appropriately balance the objectives of this section with the other policy goals and criteria established in this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 219.
Service.

Each company subject to supervision under this chapter shall be required to furnish reasonably adequate service, accommodation, and facilities to the public.
The charge made by any such company for any product or service shall be reasonable and without discrimination, except as provided in this chapter.

§ 219a.
Repealed. 2013, No. 99 (Adj. Sess.), § 10(c), effective January 1, 2017.

§ 219b.
Repealed. 2013, No. 99 (Adj. Sess.), § 10(c), effective January 1, 2017.

§ 220.
Repealed.
1975, No. 56, § 2.

§ 221.
Forms; orders.

The Commission may prescribe the forms of all books, accounts, papers, and records of any public utility over which it has jurisdiction and such public utility shall keep and render its books, accounts, papers, and records accurately and faithfully in the manner and form prescribed by the Commission and comply with all orders and directions of the Commission relating to such books, accounts, papers, and records.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1985, No. 224

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 222.
Exceptions.

Public utilities under the jurisdiction of a federal commission shall not be required to keep any system of accounts and records that would conflict with any requirement of such federal commission.

§ 223.
Appeal from municipal authorities.

A person or corporation aggrieved by an order or decision of the municipal authorities made under the provisions of any statute, relative to the granting of a license or permit for location, may appeal therefrom to the Commission at any time within 30 days from the date of such order or decision.
After notice and public hearing of all parties interested, as provided in section 208 of this title, the decision of the Commission thereon shall be final, subject to a right to transfer such cause to the Supreme Court as provided by section 12 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 224.
Special authority to municipality, to be under supervision of Commission.

Any statute conferring authority upon municipalities to supervise or to make any order or regulation respecting any location, business, or company, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall be construed as giving such municipalities jurisdiction without authority to alter or modify any order, judgment, decree, or regulation made by the Public Utility Commission.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961.

§ 225.
Rate schedules.

Within a time to be fixed by the Commission, each company subject to the provisions of this chapter shall file with the Department, with separate filings to the Directors for Regulated Utility Planning and Public Advocacy, schedules which shall be open to public inspection, showing all rates, including joint rates, for any service performed or any product furnished by it within the State, and as a part thereof shall file the rules and regulations that in any manner affect the tolls or rates charged or to be charged for any such service or product. Those schedules, or summaries of the schedules approved by the Department, shall be published by the company in two newspapers with general circulation in the State within 15 days after such filing. A change shall not thereafter be made in any such schedules, including schedules of joint rates or in any such rules and regulations, except upon 45 days’ notice to the Commission and to the Department of Public Service, and such notice to parties affected by such schedules as the Commission shall direct. The Commission shall consider the Department’s recommendation and take action pursuant to sections 226 and 227 of this title before the date on which the changed rate is to become effective. All such changes shall be plainly indicated upon existing schedules, or by filing new schedules in lieu thereof 45 days prior to the time the same are to take effect. Subject only to temporary increases, rates may not thereafter be raised without strictly complying with the notice and filing requirements set forth in this section. In no event may a company amend, supplement, or alter an existing filing or substantially revise the proof in support of such filing in order to increase, decrease, or substantiate a pending rate request, unless, upon opportunity for hearing, the company demonstrates that such a change in filing or proof is necessary for the purpose of providing adequate and efficient service. However, upon application of any company subject to the provisions of this chapter, and with the consent of the Department of Public Service, the Commission may for good cause shown prescribe a shorter time within which such change may be made; but a change which in effect decreases such tolls or rates may be made upon five days’ notice to the Commission and the Department of Public Service and such notice to parties affected as the Commission shall direct.

Immediately upon receipt of notice of a change in a rate schedule filed by a company, the Department shall investigate the justness and reasonableness of that change. Within 30 days of receipt of this notice, the Department shall either report to the Commission the results of its investigations together with its recommendation for acceptance of the change, or it shall notify the Commission and other parties that it opposes the change. If the Department of Public Service reports its acceptance of the change in rates, the Commission may accept the change, or it may on its own motion conduct an investigation into the justness and reasonableness of the change, or it may order the Department to appear before it to justify its recommendation to accept the change. In no event shall a change go into effect without the approval of the Commission, except when a rate change is suspended and temporary or permanent rates are allowed to go into effect pursuant to subsection 226(a) or 227(a) of this title. The Commission shall consider the Department’s recommendation and take action pursuant to sections 226 and 227 of this title within 45 days of receipt of notice of a change in a rate schedule. In the event that the Department opposes the change, the Commission shall hear evidence on the matter and make such orders as justice and law require. In any hearing on a change in rates, whether or not opposed by the Department, the Commission may request the appearance of the Attorney General or appoint a member of the Vermont bar to represent the public or the State.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 263

, § 2, eff. July 31, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1981, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. May 6, 1982;

1985, No. 224

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2019, No. 31

, § 18.

§ 226.
Rates, hearings, bond.

Except in the case of municipal companies formed under local charter or under chapter 79 and cooperatives formed under chapter 81 of this title, upon six days’ notice to the company affected, the Commission may suspend a rate change until it makes a final determination on the request for a rate change. However, if it shall be made to appear to the satisfaction of the Commission, that the public interest requires a change in rates, charges, or services, or that such change is necessary for the purpose of providing adequate and efficient service or for the preservation of the property of the public service company devoted to public use, the Commission, after public notice and preliminary hearing, shall authorize upon such terms, conditions, or safeguards as it deems proper an immediate reasonable temporary increase in such price pending the final determination of the price to be thereafter charged by any such public service company and the Commission may as a condition of its order allowing such temporary increase, require the petitioning company to file with the Commission a bond running to the Commission members and their successors in office in amount and with sureties approved by the Commission, conditioned that within a reasonable time prescribed by the Commission after the termination of such proceedings, the company shall, with interest, repay to or may credit the account of the persons from whom such changed rates shall be collected all sums collected in excess of the rate in force at the time such changes are filed or of such rate as shall be determined to be just and reasonable. If the Commission fails to determine the application for temporary rates, if requested, within 30 days after it is made or within 45 days after suspension, whichever is later, the requested temporary rates shall take effect subject to refund as provided in this subsection.

In the case of municipal companies formed under local charter or under chapter 79 and cooperatives formed under chapter 81 of this title, the Public Utility Commission shall not be empowered to suspend a change in the rates of a municipality or of a cooperative pending final determination as to the justness or reasonableness of such change, but the Commission shall require that the municipality or cooperative refund revenues collected in excess of those which are finally determined to be just and reasonable. Any increase in the rates of a municipality or cooperative shall be implemented by means of an identical percentage increase to each class or division of ratepayers under rate design tariffs previously approved by the Public Utility Commission until such time as the Public Utility Commission shall specifically approve an alteration in such rate design and corresponding tariffs.

If the Department does not oppose the change as provided in section 225 of this title, five persons adversely affected by the change, or, if the change adversely affects fewer than five persons, any one person so affected may apply at their own expense to the Commission by petition alleging why the change is unreasonable and unjust and asking that the Commission investigate the matter and make such orders as justice and law require. The petition shall be filed within 38 days of the date of the notice of rate change that was filed pursuant to section 225 of this title. The Commission may suspend the rates as a result of the petition. The Commission may hold a hearing on the petition. Whether or not a hearing is held, the Commission shall make such orders as justice and law require.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 263

, § 3, eff. July 31, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.),§§ 29, 30, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1981, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4, eff. May 6, 1982;

2019, No. 31

, § 19.

§ 226a.
Contracts regarding basic exchange telecommunications services.

As used in this section, “basic exchange telecommunications service” shall mean the provision of publicly switched, voice grade interactive telecommunications services between or among two or more end users, where a single central office provides that service to those two or more end users. The term may also, at the Commission’s discretion, include services which are or have been tariffed at rates equivalent to local service rates for basic exchange services.

The Department is authorized to negotiate, and upon approval of the Commission may execute on behalf of the State, a contract for a fixed term with any company providing basic exchange telecommunications services. Any such contract shall provide for:

specified basic exchange rates during the life of the contract;

minimum plant and equipment modernization schedules;

specified service quality levels for telecommunications services, including those offered to competitors, measured by objective standards;

furnishing such technical information as may be needed by a competitor in order for the competitor to offer and provide competitive services which require access to or utilize the company’s regulated basic exchange services in a manner technically equivalent to the company’s use of those regulated services;

rates, terms, and conditions for access charges for use of the company’s facilities by competitors, that are established by order of the Commission unless otherwise approved under this section by the Commission;

elimination or reduction of regulatory requirements under subsection 218(a) and sections 225, 226, 227, and 229 of this title, including rate of return requirements; and

such other rates, terms, and conditions as the Department and company may agree upon and the Commission approves, provided that the parties to the contract affirmatively demonstrate and the Commission finds that such rates, terms, and conditions are consistent with the State telecommunications purposes established under section 202c of this title and after its adoption with the State Telecommunications Plan established under section 202d of this title.

Any contract made pursuant to this section shall be written, signed by the parties, and filed with the Commission. At the time of filing a contract with the Commission, the company also shall file with the Commission for public inspection all information made available to the Department during the negotiations. After public notice and no less than 45 days after the parties have filed a contract with it, the Commission shall hold a hearing to determine whether it should approve the contract. In such proceedings, the public contract advocate appointed by the Attorney General under

3 V.S.A. § 165

shall represent the interests of the public and the State, and any interested party may intervene. The Commission shall grant approval only if it finds that a contract in its entirety is just and reasonable giving due consideration to the services and price levels covered and any risk of cross-subsidization, promotes the general good of the State, supports reasonable competition, contains fair and equitable provisions for the treatment of customer privacy interests, and takes into consideration any State Telecommunications Plan or policy adopted pursuant to section 202d of this title. The Commission shall render its decision within seven and one-half months from the date of filing of a contract. If the Commission does not grant approval, it may recommend modifications to the contract. Within 30 days after issuance of the Commission’s order, the company and the Department may file with the Commission, with service on parties to the proceeding, a modified contract, incorporating the Commission’s recommended modifications. Within 20 days after such filing, the Commission on its motion may conduct, or other substantially affected parties may request that the Commission conduct hearings or other proceedings on the proposed modifications. Such requests shall be granted only if the Commission finds that the proposed modifications deviate in substance from those recommended by the Commission or that the public interest requires that hearings be held. If no such requests are made or if the requests are denied, the Commission shall make a final decision approving or disapproving the modified contract within 45 days after the modified contract was filed. If the Commission conducts hearings, it shall make a final decision within 90 days after the modified contract was filed.

The Commission shall retain jurisdiction over any contract under this section and shall hear and resolve any disputes or claims which may arise regarding its application. During the period of any contract under this section, a company shall continue to file with the Commission and the Department its rates, tariffs, and tolls for any service provided, including any service subject to the contract, and shall also file on a monthly basis its rate of return under the contract.

If at any time, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commission determines that changes in federal regulatory law, unforeseen and significant economic shifts, or changes in technology have created either extremely severe economic hardships for the company or a condition that is severely detrimental and contrary to the public good, the Commission shall order the Department and the company to renegotiate relevant portions of a contract negotiated under this section, and any renegotiated provisions shall be subject to the Commission’s approval under the procedures of subsection (c) of this section. If at any time the General Assembly is concerned that such conditions exist, it may, by joint resolution, direct the Commission to conduct a hearing and make a determination thereon. If the Department and the company fail to reach a negotiated agreement within four months of receipt of an order to negotiate from the Commission, the Commission shall hold a hearing to determine the appropriate content of the relevant portions of the contract. In such proceedings, the public contract advocate shall represent the interests of the public and the State, and any interested party may intervene. The Commission shall complete its hearings and render its decision within four months from the date that the Department and the company failed to agree under an order to negotiate. If the Department and the company agree within 14 days of the Commission’s decision to accept the Commission’s determination of the appropriate content of the contract, the contract shall continue in effect as modified until its termination date. If the Department or the company does not accept the Commission’s determination, the contract shall terminate under the terms specified in subsection (f) of this section 30 days after the date of the Commission’s decision.

Any contract under this section shall extend for no more than five years, and this section and any contract shall terminate December 31, 1997. Upon expiration or termination of a contract, the rates, terms, and conditions then in effect under the contract shall continue in effect as duly filed and approved rates and schedules under this title and shall thereafter be subject to all of the provisions of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 87

, § 6, eff. June 9, 1987; amended

1991, No. 63

;

1999, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2003, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 33

, § 59.

§ 226b.
Incentive regulation of basic exchange telecommunications providers.

Upon petition of a basic exchange telecommunications service provider, upon request of the Department of Public Service, or on its own initiative, the Public Utility Commission may approve alternative forms of regulation other than the traditional methods based upon cost of service, rate base, and rate of return.

As used in this section:

“Alternative forms of regulation” include incentive regulation, earnings sharing, categorization of services for the purpose of pricing, price caps, price indexing formulae, ranges of authorized returns, detariffing, and reduction or suspension of regulatory requirements.

“Basic exchange telecommunications service” has the same meaning as under section 226a of this title.

The Commission shall approve alternative forms of regulation only if it finds, after notice and hearing, that such regulation, in its entirety:

promotes the general good of the State;

is consistent with the State telecommunications purposes established under section 202c of this title;

is consistent with the State Telecommunications Plan adopted by the Department of Public Service under section 202d of this title, or there exists good cause to approve alternative forms of regulation notwithstanding this inconsistency;

is consistent with the public’s interests relating to appropriate quality telecommunications services;

is consistent with the goal of protecting or promoting universal service to residential users of telecommunications;

provides reasonable incentives for the creation of a modern telecommunications infrastructure and the appropriate implementation of new cost-effective technologies;

reasonably supports economic development in the affected service territory;

adequately protects consumer privacy interests;

supports reasonable competition;

includes adequate safeguards to ensure that charges for noncompetitive services do not subsidize competitive services; and

is just and reasonable and would not produce unjust discrimination between users of the public switched network in the pricing, quality, or availability of the network functions or services offered.

Prior to approving, modifying, or renewing an alternative form of regulation with respect to a specific basic exchange telecommunications provider, the Commission shall establish, and may amend from time to time, standards and procedures by which the effectiveness of the alternative form of regulation can be determined.

In reviewing a petition to approve alternative forms of regulation, the Commission shall follow procedures substantially similar to those contained in sections 225, 226, and 227 of this title, except that if the Commission has not acted on the petition within nine months after the Commission has ordered suspension and investigation, the petition shall be deemed granted. By rule, the Commission may prescribe the minimum contents of a filing under this section.

Where a petition for alternative forms of regulation has been filed by the Department or a basic exchange telecommunications service provider, and the Commission determines that the proposal does not satisfy the requirements of this section, it may either reject the proposal or issue a proposed order approving alternative regulation with such modifications as the Commission determines necessary to satisfy the requirements of this section. Within 20 days after issuance of a proposed order under this section, any party may submit comments and may offer to provide additional evidence concerning the proposed order. After review of such comments, and after conducting any additional hearings that the Commission determines to be necessary, the Commission shall issue a final order with such modifications as the Commission determines to be necessary to satisfy the requirements of this section. If the Commission determines that evidence offered by a party reasonably should have been introduced at hearings prior to the proposed order, the Commission may exclude such evidence. The Commission shall issue its final order within 45 days after the proposed order is issued, or within 90 days after the proposed order is issued if further hearings have been held.

Any final order approving or modifying alternative forms of regulation shall, by its terms, take effect not sooner than 30 days following its issuance.

An order establishing an alternative form of regulation may include:

exemption from or reduction of the requirements of subsection 218(a) and sections 225, 226, 227, and 229 of this title, including rate of return requirements;

terms and conditions for establishing new services, withdrawing services, price changes to services, and services by contract to individual customers; and

other rates, terms, and conditions that the Commission finds to be consistent with the general considerations and standards under subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

While an order approving alternative forms of regulation is in effect, the Department of Public Service and the Public Utility Commission may conduct investigations into the effectiveness of the alternative forms of regulation, and whether a traditional form of regulation should be restored. Following notice and an opportunity for hearing, the Public Utility Commission may terminate an order establishing an alternative form of regulation and restore a traditional form of regulation, or it may modify the order approving alternative forms of regulation.

If at any time an order establishing an alternative form of regulation has been in effect for seven years without having been renewed, the order shall be deemed of no further force or effect and the waiver of statutory requirements under this title shall expire. All tariffs then in effect shall remain in effect until further order of the Commission.

A basic exchange telecommunications service provider operating under an alternative form of regulation, the Department of Public Service, or the Public Utility Commission may initiate a proceeding to renew an order approving an alternative form of regulation. The provisions of this section shall apply to a proposed renewal of an alternative form of regulation. The Commission may issue orders approving, denying, or modifying the proposed renewal. In reviewing a proposed renewal of an alternative form of regulation, the Commission may consider the basic exchange telecommunications service provider’s performance for the duration of the alternative form of regulation in effect at the time the renewal is initiated. Nothing in this section shall require the Commission to conduct cost of service, rate base, or rate of return analyses.

The Commission shall have the discretionary authority to provide an expedited process under this section for a basic exchange telecommunications provider with less than 10 percent of the access lines in this State. The process shall include notice and opportunity for hearing and may include simplified procedures. Nothing in this section requires the Commission to conduct a cost of service, rate base, or rate of return analysis for such companies as a precondition to alternative regulation.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 84

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 22, 1996;

2003, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.